fi: Sormiotteen säädettävyys: Säädettävä; Kiinteä; Magneettisesti irrotettava; Muu
es: Capacidad de ajuste de la empuñadura: Ajustable; Fijo; Desmontable magnético; Otro
sv: Justerbarhet i fingergreppet: Justerbar; Fast; Magnetisk avtagbar; Övrigt
th: ความสามารถในการปรับการจับนิ้ว: ปรับได้; แบบตายตัว; ถอดได้ด้วยแม่เหล็ก; อื่นๆ
tr: Parmak kavrama ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanabilir; Sabit; Manyetik çıkarılabilir; Diğer
zh-CN: 手指握持可调节性: 可调节; 固定; 磁吸可拆卸; 其他
de: Einstellbarkeit des Fingergriffs: Verstellbar; Fixiert; Magnetisch abnehmbar; Sonstige
fr: Réglage de la prise pour les doigts: Réglable; Fixe; Détachable magnétique; Autre
ko: 손가락 그립 조절 기능: 조절형; 고정형; 자석 분리형; 기타
nb: Justerbarhet av fingergrep: Justerbar; Fast; Avtakbar med magnet; Annet
zh-TW: 手指握把可調性: 可調式; 固定式; 磁吸可拆式; 其他
cs: Nastavitelnost gripu na prsty: Nastavitelné; Pevné; Magnetické odnímatelné; Jiné
da: Fingergrebets justerbarhed: Justerbar; Fast; Magnetisk aftagelig; Andet
ru: Регулировка захвата для пальцев: Регулируемая; Фиксированная; Магнитная съемная; Другое
pl: Regulacja chwytu palców: Regulowane; Stałe; Magnetyczne odłączane; Inne
ja: 指グリップの調整機能: 調節可能; 固定式; マグネット着脱式; その他
lt-LT: Pirštų rankenos reguliuojamumas: Reguliuojama; Fiksuota; Magnetinė, nuimama; Kita
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť úchopu prstami: Nastaviteľné; Pevné; Odnímateľné na magnet; Iné
hu: Ujjfogó állíthatósága: Állítható; Rögzített; Mágnesesen levehető; Egyéb
sl-SI: Nastavljivost oprijema prstov: Prilagodljiv; Fiksen; Magnetno snemljiv; Drugo
nl: Vingergreep verstelbaarheid: Verstelbaar; Vast; Magnetisch afneembaar; Overige
pt-PT: Ajuste da aderência dos dedos: Ajustável; Fixo; Magnético amovível; Outro
hr-HR: Podesivost hvatišta za prste: Prilagodljivo; Fiksno; Odvojivo na magnet; Ostalo
el: Ρυθμιζόμενη λαβή δακτύλων: Ρυθμιζόμενη; Σταθερή; Μαγνητική αποσπώμενη; Άλλο
ro-RO: Reglarea mânerului: Ajustabil; Fix; Detașabil magnetic; Altele
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh độ bám ngón tay: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cố định; Có thể tháo rời bằng nam châm; Khác
pt-BR: Ajuste de aderência dos dedos: Ajustável; Fixo; Destacável magnético; Outros
it: Regolazione dell'impugnatura con le dita: Regolabile; Fisso; Staccabile magnetico; Altro
bg-BG: Регулиране на хватката с пръсти: Регулируем; Фиксиран; Магнитно отделящ се; Други
en: Finger grip adjustability: Adjustable; Fixed; Magnetic detachable; Other